New Jersey, session 221, A3161.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.11A:5-1 is amended to read as follows: 11A:5-1. As used in this chapter: a.     "Disabled veteran" means any veteran who is eligible to be compensated for a service-connected disability [from war service] by the United States [Veterans Administration] Department of Veterans Affairs or who receives or is entitled to receive equivalent compensation for a service-connected disability [which arises out of military or naval service as set forth in this chapter] and who has submitted sufficient evidence of the record of disability [incurred in the line of duty] to the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and [Veterans'] Veterans Affairs and received a determination of status no later than eight days prior to the issuance of an employment list, for which that individual received a passing score on an examination; b.    "Veteran" means any [honorably discharged soldier, sailor, marine or nurse who served in any army or navy of the allies of the United States in World War I, between July 14, 1914 and November 11, 1918, or who served in any army or navy of the allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939 and September 2, 1945 and who was inducted into that service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of the enlistment, and who did not renounce or lose his or her United States citizenship; or any soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk, who has served in the active military or naval service of the United States and has been discharged or released under other than dishonorable conditions from that service in any of the following wars or conflicts] person honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof and who has presented to the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and [Veterans'] Veterans Affairs sufficient evidence of the record of service and received a determination of status no later than eight days prior to the issuance of an employment list, for which that individual received a passing score on an examination[: (1)   World War I, between April 6, 1917 and November 11, 1918; (2)   World War II, on or after September 16, 1940, who shall have served at least 90 days beginning on or before December 31, 1946 in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies; except that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service; (3)   Korean conflict, on or after June 23, 1950, who shall have served at least 90 days beginning on or before January 31, 1955, in active service, exclusive of any period of assignment for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies; except that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service; (4)   Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 1, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (5)   Vietnam conflict, on or after December 31, 1960, who shall have served at least 90 days beginning on or before May 7, 1975, in active service, exclusive of any period of assignment for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511(d) of Title 10, United States Code, or exclusive of any service performed pursuant to enlistment in the National Guard or the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; except that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as provided; (6)   Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (7)   Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (8)   Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (9)   Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (10) Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (11) Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or the Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (12) Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (13) Operation "Uphold Democracy" in Haiti, on or after September 19, 1994, who served in Haiti or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1995, and who received an Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal for such service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided or received an Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal; (14) Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (15) Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (16) In a campaign or expedition for which a medal has been authorized and recognized by the Veterans Preference Act of 1944, as amended and codified under Title 5, United States Code, for civil service preference and which has been awarded to the veteran, c.     "War service" means service by a veteran in any war or conflict described in this chapter during the periods specified]. (cf:  P.L.2021, c.429, s.1) 2.    N.J.S.11A:5-3 is amended to read as follows: 11A:5-3.  Parent and spouse of veteran who has died in service.  A parent and spouse of any veteran who died while in, and as a result of, federal active service and who would have qualified under this chapter as a veteran, shall be entitled to a disabled veterans' preference.  Where both a parent and spouse survive, the exercise of the preference by one shall suspend the right of any other so long as the first individual who exercises preference remains in the employ of the State or any political subdivision operating under the provisions of this title. (cf:  N.J.S.11A:5-3) 3.    N.J.S.11A:5-11 is amended to read as follows: 11A:5-11.  A veteran with any physical disability caused by [wounds or injuries received in the line of duty in the military or naval forces of the United States during war service set forth in N.J.S.11A:5-1] an injury, disease or disability incurred as a result of federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof, shall not be discriminated against in an examination, classification or appointment because of the disability, unless this disability, in the opinion of the Civil Service Commission, would incapacitate the veteran from properly performing the duties of the office, position or employment for which applied. (cf:  P.L.2017, c.131, s.9) 4.    N.J.S.18A:66-2 is amended to read as follows: 18A:66-2.  As used in this article: a.     "Accumulated deductions" means the sum of all the amounts, deducted from the compensation of a member or contributed by or in behalf of the member, including interest credited to January 1, 1956, standing to the credit of the member's individual account in the annuity savings fund. b.    "Annuity" means payments for life derived from the accumulated deductions of a member as provided in this article. c.     "Beneficiary" means any person receiving a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided in this article. d.    (1) "Compensation" means the contractual salary, for services as a teacher as defined in this article, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular school day or the regular school year. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, "compensation" means the amount of the contractual salary equivalent to the annual maximum wage contribution base for Social Security, pursuant to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, for services as a teacher as defined in this article, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular school day or the regular school year. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who at the time of enrollment in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 transfers service credit from another State-administered retirement system pursuant to N.J.S.18A:66-15.1, but shall apply to a former member of the retirement system who has been granted a retirement allowance and is reenrolled in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 pursuant to N.J.S.18A:66-53.2 after becoming employed again in a position that makes the person eligible to be a member of the retirement system. For the period of July 1, 2009 through June 30, 2011, "contractual salary" for State employees shall include wage increases under a collective negotiations agreement notwithstanding that, by amendment to that collective negotiations agreement, the effective date of the contractual increase has been deferred.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "State employee" means an employee in the Executive Branch of State government of New Jersey. e.     "Employer" means the State, the board of education or any educational institution or agency of or within the State by which a teacher is paid. f.     (1) "Final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the three years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the five years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any five fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. g.    "Fiscal year" means any year commencing with July 1, and ending with June 30, next following. h.    "Pension" means payments for life derived from appropriations made by the State or employers to the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund. i.     "Annuity reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of an annuity, granted under the provisions of this article, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. j.     "Pension reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of a pension granted to a member from the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. k.    "Present-entrant" means any member of the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund who had established status as a "present-entrant member" of said fund prior to January 1, 1956. l.     "Rate of contribution initially certified" means the rate of contribution certified by the retirement system in accordance with N.J.S.18A:66-29. m.   "Regular interest" shall mean interest as determined by the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Directors of the Divisions of Investment and Pensions, the board of trustees and the actuary. It shall bear a reasonable relationship to the percentage rate of earnings on investments based on the market value of assets but shall not exceed the assumed percentage rate of increase applied to salaries plus 3%, provided however that the board of trustees shall not set the average percentage rate of increase applied to salaries below 6%. n.    "Retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity. o.    "School service" means any service as a "teacher" as defined in this section. p.    "Teacher" means any regular teacher, special teacher, helping teacher, teacher clerk, principal, vice-principal, supervisor, supervising principal, director, superintendent, city superintendent, assistant city superintendent, county superintendent, State Commissioner or Assistant Commissioner of Education, members of the State Department of Education who are certificated, unclassified professional staff and other members of the teaching or professional staff of any class, public school, renaissance school project established pursuant to P.L.2011, c.176 (C.18A:36C-1 et seq.) upon commencement of employment, high school, normal school, model school, training school, vocational school, truant reformatory school, or parental school, and of any and all classes or schools within the State conducted under the order and superintendence, and wholly or partly at the expense of the State Board of Education, of a duly elected or appointed board of education, board of school directors, or board of trustees of the State or of any school district or normal school district thereof, and any persons under contract or engagement to perform one or more of these functions. It shall also mean any person who serves, while on an approved leave of absence from regular duties as a teacher, as an officer of a local, county or State labor organization which represents, or is affiliated with an organization which represents, teachers as defined in this subsection. No person shall be deemed a teacher within the meaning of this article who is a substitute teacher. In all cases of doubt the board of trustees shall determine whether any person is a teacher as defined in this article. q.    "Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund," hereinafter referred to as the "retirement system" or "system," is the corporate name of the arrangement for the payment of retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this article, including the several funds placed under said system. By that name all its business shall be transacted, its funds invested, warrants for money drawn, and payments made and all of its cash and securities and other property held. r.     "Veteran" means any [honorably discharged officer, soldier, sailor, airman, marine or nurse who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War I between July 14, 1914, and November 11, 1918, or who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939, and September 2, 1945, and who was inducted into such service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of such enlistment, and who did not, during or by reason of such service, renounce or lose United States citizenship, and any officer, soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk who has served in the active military or naval service of the United and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, in any of the following wars, uprisings, insurrections, expeditions or emergencies,] person honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof and who has presented to the [retirement system] Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to [said retirement system: (1)   The Indian wars and uprisings during any of the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as periods of active hostility; (2)   The Spanish-American War between April 20, 1898, and April 11, 1899; (3)   The Philippine insurrections and expeditions during the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as of active hostility from February 4, 1899, to the end of 1913; (4)   The Peking relief expedition between June 20, 1900, and May 27, 1902; (5)   The army of Cuban occupation between July 18, 1898, and May 20, 1902; (6)   The army of Cuban pacification between October 6, 1906, and April 1, 1909; (7)   The Mexican punitive expedition between March 14, 1916, and February 7, 1917; (8)   The Mexican border patrol, having actually participated in engagements against Mexicans between April 12, 1911, and June 16, 1919; (9)   World War I, between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918; (10) World War II, between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1946, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (11) Korean conflict on or after June 23, 1950, and on or prior to January 31, 1955, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; and provided further that any member classed as a veteran pursuant to this subsection prior to August 1, 1966, shall continue to be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person completed the 90-day service between said dates as herein provided; (12) Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 1, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (13) Vietnam conflict, on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program, which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511(d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran, whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (14) Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (15) Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (16) Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (17) Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (18) Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of the operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (19) Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (20) Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (21) Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (22) Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided] the Adjutant General. ["Veteran" also means any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits.] s.     "Child" means a deceased member's unmarried child either (a) under the age of 18 or (b) of any age who, at the time of the member's death, is disabled because of mental retardation or physical incapacity, is unable to do any substantial, gainful work because of the impairment and the impairment has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months, as affirmed by the medical board. t.     (1) "Widower," for employees of the State, means the man to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of her death and who was receiving at least one-half of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower will be considered terminated by marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widower," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the man to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married until the date of her death and who was receiving at least one-half of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower shall be considered terminated by marriage of the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widower" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. u.    (1)  "Widow," for employees of the State, means the woman to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of his death and who was receiving at least one-half of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow will be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widow," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the woman to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married until the date of his death and who was receiving at least one-half of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow shall be considered terminated by the marriage of the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widower" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. v.    "Parent" means the parent of a member who was receiving at least one-half of the parent's support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a parent will be considered terminated by marriage of the parent subsequent to the death of the member. w.   "Medical board" means the board of physicians provided for in N.J.S.18A:66-56. x.    (1)  "Spouse," for employees of the State, means the husband or wife, or domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), of a member. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, "spouse," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the husband or wife of a member. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "spouse" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. (cf:  P.L.2018, c.129, s.1) 5.    N.J.S.18A:66-13 is amended to read as follows: 18A:66-13.  Prior service credit. A member may file a detailed statement of: a. school service and service in a similar capacity in other states and in schools within and outside the United States operated by a department of the United States Government for the instruction of the children of United States Government officers and employees, or b.    other public employment in other states or with the United States Government which would be eligible for credit in a State-administered retirement system if the employment was with a public employer in this State, or c.     [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or in a Reserve component thereof, rendered prior to becoming a member, for which the member desires credit, and of such other facts as the retirement system may require. The member may purchase credit for all or a portion of the service evidenced in the statement up to the nearest number of years and months, but not exceeding 10 years, provided however, that a member purchasing that maximum credit may purchase up to five additional years [for additional military] of federal active service qualifying the member as a veteran as defined in N.J.S.18A:66-2 in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof.  No application shall be accepted for the purchase of credit for [such]: (1) a period of service if, at the time of application, the member has a vested right to retirement benefits in another retirement system based in whole or in part upon that service; or (2) a period of federal active service in any branch of a Reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States that is concurrent with other service described in subsections a. and b. of this section. The member may purchase credit for the service by paying into the annuity savings fund the amount required by applying the factor, supplied by the actuary as being applicable to the member's age at the time of the purchase, to the member's salary at that time, or to the highest annual compensation for service in this State for which contributions were made during any prior fiscal year of membership, whichever is greater.  The purchase may be made in regular installments, equal to at least one-half the full normal contribution to the retirement system, over a maximum period of 10 years.  Neither the State nor the employer of a member who applies to purchase credit for public employment with the United States Government pursuant to subsection b. of this section or for [military] federal active service pursuant to subsection c. of this section shall be liable for any payment to the retirement system on behalf of the member for the purchase of this credit. Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a member shall not be liable for any costs associated with the financing of pension adjustment benefits and health care benefits for retirees when purchasing credit for school service, public employment in other states or with the United States Government, or [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof. Any member electing to purchase the service who retires prior to completing payments as agreed with the retirement system will receive pro rata credit for service purchased prior to the date of retirement, but if the member so elects at the time of retirement, the member may make the additional lump sum payment required at that time to provide full credit. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, service credit established in the retirement system by a member through purchase in accordance with this section, which purchase was made by an application submitted on or after the effective date of P.L.2008, c.89, except a purchase for [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof, shall not be eligible for consideration when service is used to determine the qualification of the member for any health care benefits coverage paid, in whole or in part, by a public employer after the member's retirement. (cf:  P.L.2008, c.89, s.3) 6.    Section 6 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.    As used in this act: a.     "Accumulated deductions" means the sum of all the amounts, deducted from the compensation of a member or contributed by or on behalf of the member, standing to the credit of the member's individual account in the annuity savings fund. b.    "Annuity" means payments for life derived from the accumulated deductions of a member as provided in this act. c.     "Annuity reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of an annuity, granted under the provisions of this act, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. d.    "Beneficiary" means any person receiving a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided in this act. e.     "Child" means a deceased member's unmarried child either (1) under the age of 18 or (2) of any age who, at the time of the member's death, is disabled because of an intellectual disability or physical incapacity, is unable to do any substantial, gainful work because of the impairment and the impairment has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months, as affirmed by the medical board. f.     "Parent" shall mean the parent of a member who was receiving at least 1/2 of the parent's support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a parent will be considered terminated by marriage of the parent subsequent to the death of the member. g.    (1) "Widower," for employees of the State, means the man to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of her death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower will be considered terminated by marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widower," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the man to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of her death and to whom she continued to be married until the date of her death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widower shall be considered terminated by marriage of the widower subsequent to the death of the member. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widower" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. h.    (1) "Final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the three years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final compensation" means the average annual compensation for which contributions are made for the five years of creditable service in New Jersey immediately preceding the member's retirement or death, or it shall mean the average annual compensation for New Jersey service for which contributions are made during any five fiscal years of his or her membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary. i.     "Fiscal year" means any year commencing with July 1 and ending with June 30 next following. j.     "Medical board" shall mean the board of physicians provided for in section 17 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-17). k.    "Pension" means payments for life derived from appropriations made by the employer as provided in this act. l.     "Pension reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of a pension granted under the provisions of this act, computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts, with regular interest. m.   "Public Employees' Retirement System of New Jersey," hereinafter referred to as the "retirement system" or "system," is the corporate name of the arrangement for the payment of retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this act including the several funds placed under said system. By that name all of its business shall be transacted, its funds invested, warrants for money drawn, and payments made and all of its cash and securities and other property held. n.    "Regular interest" shall mean interest as determined by the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Directors of the Divisions of Investment and Pensions, the board of trustees and the actuary. It shall bear a reasonable relationship to the percentage rate of earnings on investments based on the market value of the assets but shall not exceed the assumed percentage rate of increase applied to salaries plus 3%, provided however that the board of trustees shall not set the average percentage rate of increase applied to salaries below 6%. o.    "Retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity. p.    "Veteran" means any [honorably discharged officer, soldier, sailor, airman, marine or nurse who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War I, between July 14, 1914, and November 11, 1918, or who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939, and September 2, 1945, and who was inducted into such service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of such enlistment, and who did not, during or by reason of such service, renounce or lose United States citizenship, and any officer, soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk, who has served in the active military or naval service of the United States and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, in any of the following wars, uprisings, insurrections, expeditions, or emergencies,] person honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof and who has presented to the [retirement system] Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to [said retirement system: (1)   The Indian wars and uprisings during any of the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as periods of active hostility; (2)   The Spanish-American War between April 20, 1898, and April 11, 1899; (3)   The Philippine insurrections and expeditions during the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as of active hostility from February 4, 1899, to the end of 1913; (4)   The Peking relief expedition between June 20, 1900, and May 27, 1902; (5)   The army of Cuban occupation between July 18, 1898, and May 20, 1902; (6)   The army of Cuban pacification between October 6, 1906, and April 1, 1909; (7)   The Mexican punitive expedition between March 14, 1916, and February 7, 1917; (8)   The Mexican border patrol, having actually participated in engagements against Mexicans between April 12, 1911, and June 16, 1919; (9)   World War I, between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918; (10) World War II, between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1946, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (11) Korean conflict on or after June 23, 1950, and on or prior to January 31, 1955, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; and provided further, that any member classed as a veteran pursuant to this paragraph prior to August 1, 1966, shall continue to be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 90-day service between said dates as herein provided; (12) Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 1, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (13) Vietnam conflict on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511(d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90 days' service as herein provided; (14) Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (15) Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (16) Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (17) Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (18) Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (19) Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (20) Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998 and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (21) Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (22) Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided] the Adjutant General. ["Veteran" also means any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits.] q.    (1) "Widow," for employees of the State, means the woman to whom a member was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married or a domestic partner until the date of his death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow will be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (2)   Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, "widow," for employees of public employers other than the State, means the woman to whom a member was married at least five years before the date of his death and to whom he continued to be married until the date of his death and who was receiving at least 1/2 of her support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death. The dependency of such a widow shall be considered terminated by the marriage of the widow subsequent to the member's death. In the event of the payment of an accidental death benefit, the five-year qualification shall be waived. (3)   A public employer other than the State may adopt a resolution providing that the term "widow" as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall include domestic partners as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. r.     (1) "Compensation" means the base or contractual salary, for services as an employee, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular workday or the regular work year. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007, "compensation" means the amount of base or contractual salary equivalent to the annual maximum wage contribution base for Social Security, pursuant to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, for services as an employee, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the member's employer for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary or extracurricular duties beyond the regular workday or the regular work year. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who at the time of enrollment in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 transfers service credit from another State-administered retirement system pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-14), but shall apply to a former member of the retirement system who has been granted a retirement allowance and is reenrolled in the retirement system on or after July 1, 2007 pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1966, c.217 (C.43:15A-57.2) after becoming employed again in a position that makes the person eligible to be a member of the retirement system. In cases where salary includes maintenance, the retirement system shall fix the value of that part of the salary not paid in money which shall be considered under this act. For the period of July 1, 2009 through June 30, 2011, "contractual salary" for State employees shall include across the board negotiated wage increases under a collective negotiations agreement that were payable to all State employees covered by that agreement notwithstanding that, by amendment to that collective negotiations agreement, the effective date of the contractual increase has been deferred.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "State employee" means an employee in the Executive Branch or the Judicial Branch of State government of New Jersey or an employee of the State University authorized to participate in the system under subsection b. of section 73 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-73), but shall not include employees of agencies authorized to participate in the system under subsections a., c., d., e., f., and g. of section 73 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-73) or under P.L.1990, c.25 (C.43:15A-73.2 et al.). For the period of July 1, 2009 through June 30, 2011, "contractual salary" for county and municipal employees shall include across the board negotiated wage increases under a collective negotiations agreement that were payable to all county or all municipal employees covered by that agreement notwithstanding that, by amendment to that collective negotiations agreement which has been filed with the Division of Pensions and Benefits, the effective date of the contractual increase has been deferred.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "county and municipal employees" means all persons employed by a county or municipality in this State. (cf:  P.L.2010, c.50, s.71) 7.    Section 4 of P.L.2001, c.127 (C.43:15A-24a) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The State shall be liable for any increased cost to local government employers participating in the Public Employees' Retirement System, established pursuant to P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-1 et seq.), as a result of the provisions of [this act,] P.L.2001, c.127, P.L.2001, c.128, and P.L.   , c.   (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf:  P.L.2001, c.127, s.4) 8.    Section 2 of P.L.1963, c.19 (C.43:15A-73.1) is amended to read as follows: 2.    A member may file a detailed statement of public employment in other states or with the United States Government which would be eligible for credit in a State-administered retirement system if the employment was with a public employer in this State, or of [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or in a Reserve component thereof, or of service resulting from initial appointment or employment on or after January 1, 2002 with a bi-state or multi-state agency established pursuant to an interstate compact to which the State is a party which would be eligible for credit in a State-administered retirement system if the employment was with a public employer in this State, rendered prior to becoming a member, for which the member desires credit, and of such other facts as the retirement system may require. The member may purchase credit for all or a portion of the service evidenced in the statement up to the nearest number of years and months, but not exceeding 10 years, provided however, that a member purchasing that maximum credit may purchase up to five additional years [for additional military] of federal active service qualifying the member as a veteran as defined in section 6 of P.L.1954, c.84 (C.43:15A-6) in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof.  No application shall be accepted for the purchase of credit for [the]: (1) a period of service if, at the time of application, the member has a vested right to retirement benefits in another retirement system based in whole or in part upon that service; or (2) a period of federal active service in any branch of a Reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States that is concurrent with other service described in this paragraph. The member may purchase credit for the service by paying into the annuity savings fund the amount required by applying the factor, supplied by the actuary as being applicable to the member's age at the time of the purchase, to the member's salary at that time, or to the highest annual compensation for service in this State for which contributions were made during any prior fiscal year of membership, whichever is greater.  The purchase may be made in regular installments, equal to at least 1/2 of the full normal contribution to the retirement system, over a maximum period of 10 years.  The employer of a member who applies, pursuant to this section, to purchase credit for public employment with the United States Government or for [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof shall not be liable for any payment to the retirement system on behalf of the member for the purchase of this credit. Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a member shall not be liable for any costs associated with the financing of pension adjustment benefits and health care benefits for retirees when purchasing credit for public employment in other states or with the United States Government or [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof or with a bi-state or multi-state agency. Any member electing to make a purchase pursuant to this section who retires prior to completing payments as agreed with the retirement system will receive pro rata credit for the purchase prior to the date of retirement, but if the member so elects at the time of retirement, the member may make the additional lump sum payment required at that time to provide full credit. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, service credit established in the retirement system by a member through purchase in accordance with this section, which purchase was made by an application submitted on or after the effective date of P.L.2008, c.89, except a purchase for [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof, shall not be eligible for consideration when service is used to determine the qualification of the member for any health care benefits coverage paid, in whole or in part, by a public employer after the member's retirement. (cf:  P.L.2008, c.89, s.4) 9.    Section 1 of P.L.1983, c.391 (C.43:16A-11.7) is amended to read as follows: 1.    For purposes of this act "veteran" means any [honorably discharged officer, soldier, sailor, airman, marine or nurse who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War I, between July 14, 1914, and November 11, 1918, or who served in any Army, Air Force or Navy of the Allies of the United States in World War II, between September 1, 1939, and September 2, 1945, and who was inducted into such service through voluntary enlistment, and was a citizen of the United States at the time of such enlistment, and who did not, during or by reason of such service, renounce or lose United States citizenship, and any officer, soldier, sailor, marine, airman, nurse or army field clerk, who has served in the active military or naval service of the United States and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, in any of the following wars, uprisings, insurrections, expeditions, or emergencies,] person honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof and who has presented to the [retirement system] Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to [said retirement system: (1)   The Indian wars and uprisings during any of the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as periods of active hostility; (2)   The Spanish-American War between April 20, 1898, and April 11, 1899; (3)   The Philippine insurrections and expeditions during the periods recognized by the War Department of the United States as of active hostility from February 4, 1899, to the end of 1913; (4)   The Peking relief expedition between June 20, 1900, and May 27, 1902; (5)   The army of Cuban occupation between July 18, 1898, and May 20, 1902; (6)   The army of Cuban pacification between October 6, 1906, and April 1, 1909; (7)   The Mexican punitive expedition between March 14, 1916, and February 7, 1917; (8)   The Mexican border patrol, having actually participated in engagements against Mexicans between April 12, 1911, and June 16, 1919; (9)   World War I between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918; (10) World War II, between September 16, 1940, and December 31, 1946, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; (11) Korean conflict on or after June 23, 1950, and on or prior to January 31, 1955, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90-day service as herein provided; and provided further, that any member classed as a veteran pursuant to this subparagraph prior to August 1, 1966, shall continue to be classed as a veteran whether or not the member completed the 90-day service between said dates as herein provided; (12) Lebanon crisis, on or after July 1, 1958, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November l, 1958 or the date of termination of that conflict, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (13) Vietnam conflict on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511 (d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90 days' service as herein provided; (14) Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (15) Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (16) Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (17) Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (18) Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (19) Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (20) Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (21) Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (22) Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided. "Veteran" also means any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans' benefits] the Adjutant General. (cf:  P.L.2005, c.64, s.4) 10.  Section 3 of P.L.1991, c.153 (C.43:16A-11.11) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Members of Police and Firemen's Retirement System may purchase credit A member of the Police and Firemen's Retirement System may file a detailed statement of public employment in other states or with the United States Government which would be eligible for credit in a State-administered retirement system if the employment was with a public employer in this State, or of [military] federal active service in the Armed Forces of the United States or in a Reserve component thereof, rendered prior to becoming a member, for which the member desires credit, and of such other facts as the retirement system may require.  The member may purchase credit for all or a portion of the service evidenced in the statement up to the nearest number of years and months, but not exceeding 10 years, provided however, that a member purchasing that maximum credit may purchase up to five additional years [for additional military] of federal active service qualifying the member as a veteran as defined in section 1 of P.L.1983, c.391 (C.43:16A-11.7) in the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof.  No application shall be accepted for the purchase of credit for [the]: (1) a period of service if, at the time of application, the member has a vested right to retirement benefits in another retirement system based in whole or in part upon that service; or (2) a period of federal active service in a Reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States that is concurrent with other service described in this paragraph. The member may purchase credit for the service by paying into the annuity savings fund the amount required by applying the factor, supplied by the actuary as being applicable to the member's age at the time of the purchase, to the member's salary at that time, or to the highest annual compensation for service in this State for which contributions were made during any prior fiscal year of membership, whichever is greater.  The purchase may be made in regular installments equal to at least 1/2 of the full normal contribution to the retirement system, over a maximum period of 10 years.  The employer of a member who applies, pursuant to this section, to purchase credit for public employment with the United States Government or for [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof, shall not be liable for any payment to the retirement system on behalf of the member for the purchase of this credit. Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a member shall not be liable for any costs associated with the financing of pension adjustment benefits and health care benefits for retirees when purchasing credit for public employment in other states or with the United States Government or [military] federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof. Any member electing to purchase the service who retires prior to completing payments as agreed with the retirement system will receive pro rata credit for service purchased prior to the date of retirement, but if the member so elects at the time of retirement, the member may make the additional lump sum payment required at that time to provide full credit. (cf:  P.L.1991, c.153, s.3) 11.  Section 3 of P.L.1965, c.89 (C.53:5A-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in this act: a.     "Aggregate contributions" means the sum of all the amounts, deducted from the salary of a member or contributed by him or on his behalf, standing to the credit of his individual account in the Annuity Savings Fund.  Interest credited on contributions to the former "State Police Retirement and Benevolent Fund" shall be included in a member's aggregate contributions. b.    "Annuity" means payments for life derived from the aggregate contributions of a member. c.     "Annuity reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of an annuity, computed upon the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as the board of trustees adopts and regular interest. d.    "Beneficiary" means any person entitled to receive any benefit pursuant to the provisions of this act by reason of the death of a member or retirant. e.     "Board of trustees" or "board" means the board provided for in section 30 of this act. f.     "Child" means a deceased member's or retirant's unmarried child either (a) under the age of 18, or (b) 18 years of age or older and enrolled in a secondary school, or (c) under the age of 24 and enrolled in a degree program in an institution of higher education for at least 12 credit hours in each semester, provided that the member died in active service as a result of an accident met in the actual performance of duty at some definite time and place, and the death was not the result of the member's willful misconduct, or (d) of any age who, at the time of the member's or retirant's death, is disabled because of an intellectual disability or physical incapacity, is unable to do any substantial, gainful work because of the impairment and his impairment has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months, as affirmed by the medical board. g.    "Creditable service" means service rendered for which credit is allowed on the basis of contributions made by the member or the State. h.    "Parent" means the parent of a member who was receiving at least one-half of his support from the member in the 12-month period immediately preceding the member's death or the accident which was the direct cause of the member's death.  The dependency of such a parent will be considered terminated by marriage of the parent subsequent to the death of the member. i. (1) "Final compensation" means the average compensation received by the member in the last 12 months of creditable service preceding his retirement or death.  Such term includes the value of the member's maintenance allowance for this same period. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final compensation" means the average annual compensation for service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary.  Such term includes the value of the member's maintenance allowance for this same period. j. (1) "Final salary" means the average salary received by the member in the last 12 months of creditable service preceding his retirement or death.  Such term shall not include the value of the member's maintenance allowance. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "final salary" means the average annual salary for service for which contributions are made during any three fiscal years of membership providing the largest possible benefit to the member or the member's beneficiary.  Such term shall not include the value of the member's maintenance allowance. k.    "Fiscal year" means any year commencing with July 1 and ending with June 30 next following. l.     "Medical board" means the board of physicians provided for in section 30 of this act. m.   "Member" means any full-time, commissioned officer, non-commissioned officer or trooper of the Division of State Police of the Department of Law and Public Safety of the State of New Jersey enrolled in the retirement system established by this act. n.    "Pension" means payment for life derived from contributions by the State. o.    "Pension reserve" means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of any pension computed on the basis of such mortality tables recommended by the actuary as shall be adopted by the board of trustees and regular interest. p.    "Regular interest" means interest as determined by the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Directors of the Divisions of Investment and Pensions, the board of trustees and the actuary.  It shall bear a reasonable relationship to the percentage rate of earnings on investments based on the market value of the assets but shall not exceed the assumed percentage rate of increase applied to salaries plus 3%, provided however that the board of trustees shall not set the average percentage rate of increase applied to salaries below 6%. q.    "Retirant" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance as provided by this act. r.     "Retirement allowance" means the pension plus the annuity. s.     "State Police Retirement System of New Jersey," herein also referred to as the "retirement system" or "system," is the corporate name of the arrangement for the payment of retirement allowances and of the benefits under the provisions of this act including the several funds placed under said system.  By that name, all of its business shall be transacted, its funds invested, warrants for moneys drawn, and payments made and all of its cash and securities and other property held.  All assets held in the name of the former "State Police Retirement and Benevolent Fund" shall be transferred to the retirement system established by this act. t.     "Surviving spouse" means the person to whom a member or a retirant was married, or a domestic partner as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), on the date of the death of the member or retirant. The dependency of such a surviving spouse will be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the surviving spouse subsequent to the member's or the retirant's death, except that in the event of the payment of accidental death benefits, pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1965, c.89 (C.53:5A-14), the dependency of such a surviving spouse or domestic partner will not be considered terminated by the marriage of, or establishment of a domestic partnership by, the surviving spouse subsequent to the member's death. u.    (1) "Compensation" for purposes of computing pension contributions means the base salary, for services as a member as defined in this act, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the State for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary duties beyond the regular workday or shift. (2)   In the case of a person who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.1, "compensation" means the amount of base salary equivalent to the annual maximum wage contribution base for Social Security, pursuant to the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, for services as a member as defined in this act, which is in accordance with established salary policies of the State for all employees in the same position but shall not include individual salary adjustments which are granted primarily in anticipation of the member's retirement or additional remuneration for performing temporary duties beyond the regular workday or shift. v.    "Veteran" means any person [who has served in the United States Armed Forces and has or shall be discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, in any of the following wars or emergencies,] person honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof and who has presented to the [retirement system] Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs evidence of such record of service in form and content satisfactory to the [retirement system: (1)   Vietnam conflict on or after December 31, 1960, and on or prior to May 7, 1975, who shall have served at least 90 days in such active service, exclusive of any period of assignment (1) for a course of education or training under the Army Specialized Training Program or the Navy College Training Program which course was a continuation of a civilian course and was pursued to completion, or (2) as a cadet or midshipman at one of the service academies, any part of which 90 days was served between said dates; and exclusive of any service performed pursuant to the provisions of section 511 (d) of Title 10, United States Code, pursuant to an enlistment in the Army National Guard or as a reserve for service in the Army Reserve, Naval Reserve, Air Force Reserve, Marine Corps Reserve, or Coast Guard Reserve; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 90 days' service as herein provided; (2)   Lebanon peacekeeping mission, on or after September 26, 1982, who has served in Lebanon or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before December 1, 1987 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (3)   Grenada peacekeeping mission, on or after October 23, 1983, who has served in Grenada or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before November 21, 1983 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (4)   Panama peacekeeping mission, on or after December 20, 1989 or the date of inception of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in Panama or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before January 31, 1990 or the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (5)   Operation "Desert Shield/Desert Storm" mission in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, on or after August 2, 1990 or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of inception is earliest, who has served in the Arabian peninsula or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the Persian Gulf for a period, continuous or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days commencing on or before the date of termination of that mission, as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date of termination is the latest, in such active service; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (6)   Operation Northern Watch and Operation Southern Watch, on or after August 27, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of inception is earliest, who served in the theater of operation, including in the Arabian peninsula and the Persian Gulf, and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service, commencing on or before the date of termination of that operation, as proclaimed by the President of the United States, Congress or United States Secretary of Defense, whichever date of termination is the latest; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; (7)   Operation "Restore Hope" in Somalia, on or after December 5, 1992, or the date of inception of that operation as proclaimed by the President of the United States or Congress, whichever date is earliest, who has served in Somalia or on board any ship actively engaged in patrolling the territorial waters of that nation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before March 31, 1994; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14-day service as herein provided; (8)   Operations "Joint Endeavor" and "Joint Guard" in the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina, on or after November 20, 1995, who served in such active service in direct support of one or both of the operations for at least 14 days, continuously or in the aggregate, commencing on or before June 20, 1998, and (1) was deployed in that nation or in another area in the region, or (2) was on board a United States naval vessel operating in the Adriatic Sea, or (3) operated in airspace above the Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina; provided that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person completed the 14-day service requirement; (9)   Operation "Enduring Freedom", on or after September 11, 2001, who served in a theater of operation and in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided; and (10) Operation "Iraqi Freedom", on or after the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the inception date of that operation, who served in Iraq or in another area in the region in direct support of that operation for a period, continuously or in the aggregate, of at least 14 days in such active service commencing on or before the date the President of the United States or the United States Secretary of Defense designates as the termination date of that operation; provided, that any person receiving an actual service-incurred injury or disability while engaged in such service shall be classed as a veteran whether or not that person has completed the 14 days' service as herein provided] Adjutant General. (cf:  P.L.2016, c.26, s.1) 12.  (New section) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a resident of this State who is in federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof, and has not been discharged or released therefrom, but who otherwise qualifies as a veteran, shall be eligible for a civil service preference on the same basis as a veteran.  Instead of the certificate of honorable discharge or release under honorable circumstances required to be provided to the Adjutant General of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs pursuant to N.J.S.11A:5-1, the applicant shall provide to the Adjutant General, in a form and content the Adjutant General shall deem appropriate, evidence of status in federal active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States or a Reserve component thereof and evidence of subsequent discharge therefrom no later than eight days prior to the issuance of an employment list for which that individual received a passing score. 13.  N.J.S.11A:5-13 and section 3 of P.L.2001, c.128 (C.43:15A-24b) are repealed. 14.  This act shall take effect immediately, except that section 1 shall take effect on the 1st day of the calendar year following approval by the voters of an authorizing amendment to Article VII, Section I, paragraph 2 of the Constitution of the State of New Jersey.